Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202676-3710
Real estate within cities and villages; manufacturing or industrial establishments; applicability of act.

(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the provisions of the Foreign-owned Real Estate National Security Act shall not apply to any real estate lying within the corporate limits of cities and villages, or within three miles of such corporate limits, nor to any manufacturing or industrial establishment described in section 76-3709.

(2) A restricted entity, or an agent, trustee, or fiduciary thereof, who purchases, acquires, holds title to, or is the lessor or lessee of any real estate lying within the corporate limits of cities and villages, or within three miles of such corporate limits, or any manufacturing or industrial establishment described in section 76-3709 shall be subject to sections 76-3703 and 76-3709. A restricted entity, or an agent, trustee, or fiduciary thereof, who violates this subsection shall be subject to divestment as prescribed under section 76-3712.

Laws 1889, c. 58, § 4, p. 485;

R.S.1913, § 6276;

Laws 1919, c. 136, § 1, p. 313;

Laws 1921, c. 142, § 3, p. 609;

C.S.1922, § 5690;

C.S.1929, § 76-505;

Laws 1931, c. 128, § 1, p. 361;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 76-505;

R.S.1943, § 76-414;

Laws 1953, c. 264, § 2, p. 876;

Laws 1957, c. 318, § 1, p. 1135;

R.S.1943, (2018), § 76-414;

Laws 2024, LB1301, § 13;

Laws 2025, LB7, § 7.

Lands involved were not within the exception created by this section. Semrad v. Semrad, 170 Neb. 911, 104 N.W.2d 338 (1960).

This section and others referred to herein in conjunction with it do not deny equal protection of the law as guaranteed by the equal protection clause of the Fourteenth Amendment to the Constitution of the United States. Shames v. State of Nebraska, 323 F.Supp. 1321 (D. Neb. 1971).